Massachusetts, session 194th, H1494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Not later than January 1, 2024, the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall promulgate regulations pursuant to its authority under sections 3 and 6 of
Chapter 23B the General Laws, as appearing in 2022 Official Edition, for the purpose of
implementing legal authority for said executive office, its departments and contracted regional
administering agencies to accept applications from landlords, on behalf of their tenants, to the
Massachusetts Rental Voucher Program, Alternative Housing Voucher Program, Rental
Assistance for Families in Transition program, and other similar or succeeding programs as may
be established.
of 1